New York, session 2025-2026, S7367.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 669-i 2 to read as follows: 3 § 669-i. Course credit for volunteer firefighters and emergency 4 medical technicians. 1. For purposes of this section, the term "volun- 5 teer firefighter" shall have the same meaning as provided for in section 6 three of the volunteer firefighters' benefit law. 7 2. Every volunteer firefighter and emergency medical technician who is 8 also enrolled on a full-time basis as an undergraduate student in good 9 standing, at an institution within the state university of New York or 10 the city university of New York, shall upon application be granted up to 11 three academic credits per year and six credits in the aggregate towards 12 their degree. No fee, tuition or other charge shall be assessed against 13 a volunteer firefighter or emergency medical technician who qualifies 14 for such credit pursuant to this section. 15 3. The board of trustees of the state university of New York and the 16 city university of New York shall adopt a policy to implement the 17 provisions of this section. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 19 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07780-02-5